District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0177.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Extreme Heat Eviction Protection Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec 2. Section 501(k) of the Rental Housing Act of 1985, effective July 17, 1985 (D.C.
Law 6-10; D.C. Code § 42-3505.01(k)), is amended as follows:
(a) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “Celsius; or” and inserting the phrase
“Celsius;” in its place.
(b) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “rental unit.” and inserting the phrase
“rental unit; or” in its place.
(c) A new paragraph (3) is added to read follows:
“(3) On any day when the National Weather Service predicts at 8:00 a.m. the
temperature at the National Airport weather station will rise above 95 degrees Fahrenheit or 35
degrees Celsius.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2